Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 4. Sexual Offenses.
Sec. 11.41.470.
Definitions.

For purposes of AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.470

, unless the context requires otherwise,

“health care worker” includes a person who is or purports to be an acupuncturist, advanced practice registered nurse, anesthesiologist, certified direct-entry midwife, chiropractor, dentist, health aide, hypnotist, massage therapist, mental health counselor, midwife, nurse, osteopath, naturopath, physical therapist, physical therapy assistant, physician, physician assistant, psychiatrist, psychological associate, psychologist, radiologist, religious healing practitioner, surgeon, x-ray technician, or a substantially similar position;

“incapacitated” means temporarily incapable of appraising the nature of one’s own conduct or physically unable to express unwillingness to act;

“juvenile facility staff” has the meaning given in AS

11.41.425(b)

;

“legal guardian” means a person who is under a duty to exercise general supervision over a minor or other person committed to the custody of the Department of Health and Social Services under AS 47.10 or AS 47.12 as a result of a court order, statute, or regulation, and includes Department of Health and Social Services employees, foster parents, and staff members and other employees of treatment institutions, group homes, or youth facilities where the minor or other person is placed as a result of a court order or the action of the Department of Health and Social Services, and police officers, juvenile and adult probation officers, and social workers when those persons are exercising custodial control over a minor or other person;

“mentally incapable” means suffering from a mental disease or defect that renders the person incapable of understanding the nature or consequences of the person’s conduct, including the potential for harm to that person;

“position of authority” means one of the following, or a person in a substantially similar position: an employer, youth leader, scout leader, coach, teacher, counselor, school administrator, religious leader, doctor, nurse, psychologist, guardian ad litem, babysitter, police officer, correctional employee, juvenile facility staff, staff member of a treatment institution, or juvenile or adult probation officer other than when the officer or staff member is exercising custodial control over a minor;

“sexual act” means sexual penetration or sexual contact;

“treatment institution” has the meaning given in AS

47.14.990

;

“victim” means the person alleged to have been subjected to sexual assault in any degree or sexual abuse of a minor in any degree;

“without consent” means that a person

with or without resisting, is coerced by the use of force against a person or property, or by the express or implied threat of death, imminent physical injury, or kidnapping to be inflicted on anyone; or

is incapacitated as a result of an act of the defendant.

History.

(§ 3 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 5 ch 78 SLA 1983; am § 5 ch 96 SLA 1988; am § 28 ch 50 SLA 1989; am § 5 ch 151 SLA 1990; am § 9 ch 79 SLA 1992; am § 7 ch 63 SLA 1997; am § 3 ch 33 SLA 2000; am § 25 ch 33 SLA 2016; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Cross references. —

Definition of “force,” “property,” “physical injury” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Kidnapping -
AS

11.41.300

Sexual assault in the first and second degree - AS

11.41.410

,

11.41.420

For definition of terms used in this title, see AS

11.81.900

.

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1988 to alphabetize the defined terms and in 1990, 1992, 2016, and 2021 to maintain alphabetical order.

In 2001, “physician assistant” was substituted for “physician’s assistant” in the definition of “health care worker” to correct a manifest error.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (1), deleted “nurse midwife,” and substituted “practice registered nurse” for “nurse practitioner” following “advanced”.

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (3) [now (4)], inserted “treatment institutions,” following “other employees of” and “juvenile and adult” following “police officers,”, and made a related change; in (5) [now (6)], inserted “one of the following, or a person in a substantially similar position:” following “means”, and substituted “police officer, correctional employee, juvenile facility staff, staff member of a treatment institution, or juvenile or adult probation officer” for “or a substantially similar position and a police officer or probation officer”; added (9) [now (3)] and (10) [now (8)].

Editor’s notes. —

Section 27(c), ch. 63, SLA 1997 provides that the amendment made by § 7, ch. 63, SLA 1997 applies “to offenses committed on or after July 1, 1997.”

Section 57(a),
ch. 16, SLA 2021, provides that the 2021 amendments of paragraphs (4) and (6) of this section and the enactment of paragraphs (3) and (8) of this section, as renumbered in 2021, “apply to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2021.” Section 57(b),
ch. 16, SLA 2021, provides that the 2021 amendments of paragraphs (4) and (6) of this section and the enactment of paragraphs (3) and (8) of this section, as renumbered in 2021, apply to minors subject to
AS

47.12.030(a)

, as amended by sec. 22,
ch. 16, SLA 2021, and
AS

47.12.100

” who are held in a facility operated by the Department of Corrections or a facility operated by the Department of Health and Social Services on or after July 9, 2021.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 16, SLA 2021 (HB 105), which amended paragraphs (4) and (6) of this section and enacted paragraphs (3) and (8) of this section, see 2021 House Journal 181 — 182.